Hawaii statutes.
§521-7 Exclusions from application of
chapter. Unless created solely to avoid the application of this chapter,
this chapter shall not apply to:

(1) Residence at an institution, whether public or
private, where residence is merely incidental to detention or the provision of
medical, geriatric, educational, religious, or similar services;

(2) Residence in a structure directly controlled and
managed by:

(A) The University of Hawaii or any other
university or college in the State for housing its own students or faculty or
residence in a structure erected on land leased from the university or college
by a nonprofit corporation for the exclusive purpose of housing students or
faculty of the college or university; or

(B) A private dorm management company that
offers a minimum of fifty beds to students of any college, university, or other
institution of higher education in the State;

(3) Occupancy under a bona fide contract of sale of
the dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part where the tenant is, or
succeeds to the interest of, the purchaser;

(4) Residence by a member of a fraternal organization
in a structure operated without profit for the benefit of the organization;

(5) Transient occupancy on a day-to-day basis in a
hotel or motel;

(6) Occupancy by an employee of the owner or landlord
whose right to occupancy is conditional upon that employment or by a pensioner
of the owner or landlord or occupancy for a period of up to four years
subsequent thereto, pursuant to a plan for the transfer of the dwelling unit or
the property of which it is a part to the occupant;

(7) A lease of improved residential land for a term
of fifteen years or more, measured from the date of the commencement of the
lease;

(8) Occupancy by the prospective purchaser after an
accepted offer to purchase and prior to the actual transfer of the owner's
rights;

(9) Occupancy in a homeless facility or any other
program for the homeless authorized under part XVII of chapter 346;

(10) Residence or occupancy in a public housing
project or complex directly controlled, owned, or managed by the Hawaii public
housing authority pursuant to the federal low rent public housing program; or

(11) Residence or occupancy in a transitional facility
for abused family or household members. [L 1972, c 132, pt of §1; am L 1986, c
112, §1; am L 1988, c 307, §1; am L 1991, c 18, §1 and c 212, §8; am L 1994, c
248, §1; am L 1995, c 43, §1; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 1998, c 11, §27; am L
2005, c 196, §26(a); am L 2006, c 24, §6 and c 180, §16; am L 2007, c 193, §5
as superseded by c 249, §30; am L 2010, c 89, §11; am L 2012, c 43, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next